Illinois, session 104th, HB2956.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Liquor Control Act of 1934 is amended by 5changing Section 6-5 as follows: 6    (235 ILCS 5/6-5)  (from Ch. 43, par. 122)7    Sec. 6-5. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, it 8is unlawful for any person having a retailer's license or any 9officer, associate, member, representative or agent of such 10licensee to accept, receive or borrow money, or anything else 11of value, or accept or receive credit (other than 12merchandising credit in the ordinary course of business for a 13period not to exceed 30 days) directly or indirectly from any 14manufacturer, importing distributor or distributor of 15alcoholic liquor, or from any person connected with or in any 16way representing, or from any member of the family of, such 17manufacturer, importing distributor, distributor or 18wholesaler, or from any stockholders in any corporation 19engaged in manufacturing, distributing or wholesaling of such 20liquor, or from any officer, manager, agent or representative 21of said manufacturer. Except as provided below, it is unlawful 22for any manufacturer or distributor or importing distributor 23to give or lend money or anything of value, or otherwise loan   HB2956- 2 -LRB104 10203 RPS 20277 b1or extend credit (except such merchandising credit) directly 2or indirectly to any retail licensee or to the manager, 3representative, agent, officer or director of such licensee. A 4manufacturer, distributor or importing distributor may furnish 5free advertising, posters, signs, brochures, hand-outs, or 6other promotional devices or materials to any unit of 7government owning or operating any auditorium, exhibition 8hall, recreation facility or other similar facility holding a 9retailer's license, provided that the primary purpose of such 10promotional devices or materials is to promote public events 11being held at such facility. A unit of government owning or 12operating such a facility holding a retailer's license may 13accept such promotional devices or materials designed 14primarily to promote public events held at the facility. No 15retail licensee delinquent beyond the 30 day period specified 16in this Section shall solicit, accept or receive credit, 17purchase or acquire alcoholic liquors, directly or indirectly 18from any other licensee, and no manufacturer, distributor or 19importing distributor shall knowingly grant or extend credit, 20sell, furnish or supply alcoholic liquors to any such 21delinquent retail licensee; provided that the purchase price 22of all beer sold to a retail licensee shall be paid by the 23retail licensee in cash on or before delivery of the beer, and 24unless the purchase price payable by a retail licensee for 25beer sold to him in returnable bottles shall expressly include 26a charge for the bottles and cases, the retail licensee shall,   HB2956- 3 -LRB104 10203 RPS 20277 b1on or before delivery of such beer, pay the seller in cash a 2deposit in an amount not less than the deposit required to be 3paid by the distributor to the brewer; but where the brewer 4sells direct to the retailer, the deposit shall be an amount no 5less than that required by the brewer from his own 6distributors; and provided further, that in no instance shall 7this deposit be less than 50 cents for each case of beer in 8pint or smaller bottles and 60 cents for each case of beer in 9quart or half-gallon bottles; and provided further, that the 10purchase price of all beer sold to an importing distributor or 11distributor shall be paid by such importing distributor or 12distributor in cash on or before the 15th day (Sundays and 13holidays excepted) after delivery of such beer to such 14purchaser; and unless the purchase price payable by such 15importing distributor or distributor for beer sold in 16returnable bottles and cases shall expressly include a charge 17for the bottles and cases, such importing distributor or 18distributor shall, on or before the 15th day (Sundays and 19holidays excepted) after delivery of such beer to such 20purchaser, pay the seller in cash a required amount as a 21deposit to assure the return of such bottles and cases. In 22addition to the items that a manufacturer, importing 23distributor, or distributor may give or sell to a retailer 24pursuant to this Section and Section 6-6, nothing herein 25contained shall prohibit any manufacturer, importing 26distributor, or distributor from providing tap handles, kegs,   HB2956- 4 -LRB104 10203 RPS 20277 b1or barrels to a retailer pursuant to a written deposit 2agreement in which the deposit is in an amount equal to or less 3than the actual amount of money required to be paid by the 4manufacturer, distributor, or importing distributor to the 5manufacturer or supplier of any tap handles, kegs, or barrels, 6and any customary and reasonable delivery or freight fees. It 7shall be unlawful for a retailer, but not for any other 8licensee, to fail to return tap handles, bottles, cases, kegs, 9or barrels provided to a retailer pursuant to a written 10deposit agreement with a manufacturer, importing distributor, 11or distributor upon demand of the manufacturer, importing 12distributor, or distributor. Nothing herein contained shall 13prohibit any licensee from crediting or refunding to a 14purchaser the actual amount of money paid for tap handles, 15bottles, cases, kegs, or barrels returned by the purchaser to 16the seller or paid by the purchaser as a deposit on tap 17handles, bottles, cases, kegs, or barrels, when such 18containers or packages are returned to the seller. Nothing 19herein contained shall prohibit any manufacturer, importing 20distributor or distributor from extending usual and customary 21credit for alcoholic liquor sold to customers or purchasers 22who live in or maintain places of business outside of this 23State when such alcoholic liquor is actually transported and 24delivered to such points outside of this State.25    A manufacturer, distributor, or importing distributor may 26furnish free social media advertising to a retail licensee if   HB2956- 5 -LRB104 10203 RPS 20277 b1the social media advertisement does not contain the retail 2price of any alcoholic liquor and the social media 3advertisement complies with any applicable rules or 4regulations issued by the Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade 5Bureau of the United States Department of the Treasury. A 6manufacturer, distributor, or importing distributor may list 7the names of one or more unaffiliated retailers in the 8advertisement of alcoholic liquor through social media. 9Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a retailer from 10communicating with a manufacturer, distributor, or importing 11distributor on social media or sharing media on the social 12media of a manufacturer, distributor, or importing 13distributor. A retailer may request free social media 14advertising from a manufacturer, distributor, or importing 15distributor. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a 16manufacturer, distributor, or importing distributor from 17sharing, reposting, or otherwise forwarding a social media 18post by a retail licensee, so long as the sharing, reposting, 19or forwarding of the social media post does not contain the 20retail price of any alcoholic liquor. No manufacturer, 21distributor, or importing distributor shall pay or reimburse a 22retailer, directly or indirectly, for any social media 23advertising services, except as specifically permitted in this 24Act. No retailer shall accept any payment or reimbursement, 25directly or indirectly, for any social media advertising 26services offered by a manufacturer, distributor, or importing   HB2956- 6 -LRB104 10203 RPS 20277 b1distributor, except as specifically permitted in this Act. For 2the purposes of this Section, "social media" means a service, 3platform, or site where users communicate with one another and 4share media, such as pictures, videos, music, and blogs, with 5other users free of charge. 6    No right of action shall exist for the collection of any 7claim based upon credit extended to a distributor, importing 8distributor or retail licensee contrary to the provisions of 9this Section.10    Every manufacturer, importing distributor and distributor 11shall submit or cause to be submitted, to the State 12Commission, not later than Thursday of each calendar week, a 13verified written list of the names and respective addresses of 14each retail licensee purchasing spirits or wine from such 15manufacturer, importing distributor or distributor who, on the 16first business day of that calendar week, was delinquent 17beyond the above mentioned permissible merchandising credit 18period of 30 days; or, if such is the fact, a verified written 19statement that no retail licensee purchasing spirits or wine 20was then delinquent beyond such permissible merchandising 21credit period of 30 days.22    Every manufacturer, importing distributor and distributor 23shall submit or cause to be submitted, to the State 24Commission, a verified written list of the names and 25respective addresses of each previously reported delinquent 26retail licensee who has cured such delinquency by payment,   HB2956- 7 -LRB104 10203 RPS 20277 b1which list shall be submitted not later than the close of the 2second full business day following the day such delinquency 3was so cured.4    The written list of delinquent retail licensees shall be 5developed, administered, and maintained only by the State 6Commission. The State Commission shall notify each retail 7licensee that it has been placed on the delinquency list. 8Determinations of delinquency or nondelinquency shall be made 9only by the State Commission. 10    Such written verified reports required to be submitted by 11this Section shall be posted by the State Commission in each of 12its offices in places available for public inspection not 13later than the day following receipt thereof by the State 14Commission. The reports so posted shall constitute notice to 15every manufacturer, importing distributor and distributor of 16the information contained therein. Actual notice to 17manufacturers, importing distributors and distributors of the 18information contained in any such posted reports, however 19received, shall also constitute notice of such information.20    The 30-day merchandising credit period allowed by this 21Section shall commence with the day immediately following the 22date of invoice and shall include all successive days 23including Sundays and holidays to and including the 30th 24successive day.25    In addition to other methods allowed by law, payment by 26check or credit card during the period for which merchandising   HB2956- 8 -LRB104 10203 RPS 20277 b1credit may be extended under the provisions of this Section 2shall be considered payment. All checks received in payment 3for alcoholic liquor shall be promptly deposited for 4collection. A post dated check or a check dishonored on 5presentation for payment shall not be deemed payment.6    A credit card payment in dispute by a retailer shall not be 7deemed payment, and the debt uncured for merchandising credit 8shall be reported as delinquent. Nothing in this Section shall 9prevent a distributor, self-distributing manufacturer, or 10importing distributor from assessing a usual and customary 11transaction fee representative of the actual finance charges 12incurred for processing a credit card payment. This 13transaction fee shall be disclosed on the invoice. It shall be 14considered unlawful for a distributor, importing distributor, 15or self-distributing manufacturer to waive finance charges for 16retailers. 17    A retail licensee shall not be deemed to be delinquent in 18payment for any alleged sale to him of alcoholic liquor when 19there exists a bona fide dispute between such retailer and a 20manufacturer, importing distributor or distributor with 21respect to the amount of indebtedness existing because of such 22alleged sale. A retail licensee shall not be deemed to be 23delinquent under this provision and 11 Ill. Adm. Code 100.90 24until 30 days after the date on which the region in which the 25retail licensee is located enters Phase 4 of the Governor's 26Restore Illinois Plan as issued on May 5, 2020.   HB2956- 9 -LRB104 10203 RPS 20277 b1    A delinquent retail licensee who engages in the retail 2liquor business at 2 or more locations shall be deemed to be 3delinquent with respect to each such location.4    The license of any person who violates any provision of 5this Section shall be subject to suspension or revocation in 6the manner provided by this Act.7    If any part or provision of this Article or the 8application thereof to any person or circumstances shall be 9adjudged invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, such 10judgment shall be confined by its operation to the controversy 11in which it was mentioned and shall not affect or invalidate 12the remainder of this Article or the application thereof to 13any other person or circumstance and to this and the 14provisions of this Article are declared severable.15(Source: P.A. 102-8, eff. 6-2-21; 102-442, eff. 1-1-22; 16102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-363, eff. 7-28-23.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.